Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 21
LIQUIDATION

11-21-101 to 11-21-123. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article repealed, p. 611, § 36, effective July 1; entire article repealed, p. 2023, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 14 of chapter 14, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1981, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For liquidation procedure under the "Colorado Banking Code", see article 103 of this title 11.